Utah statutes.
78A-6-201.   Judges of juvenile court -- Appointments -- Terms.

(1)  Judges of the juvenile court shall be appointed initially to serve until the first general election held more than three years after the effective date of the appointment.  Thereafter, the term of office of a judge of a juvenile court is six years and commences on the first Monday in January next following the date of election.

(2)  A judge whose term expires may serve, upon request of the Judicial Council, until a successor is appointed and qualified.

